en: Tracking aid type: Both rudder and skeg; None; Rudder; Skeg; Other
hu: Iránytartást segítő eszköz típusa: Kormánylapát és szkeg is; Nincs; Kormánylapát; Szkeg; Egyéb
zh-CN: 循迹辅助类型: 方向舵和尾鳍; 无; 方向舵; 尾鳍; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta pomagala za praćenje: I kormilo i skeg; Nijedno; Kormilo; Skeg; Ostalo
el: Τύπος βοηθήματος ευθυγράμμισης: Πηδάλιο και πτερύγιο; Κανένα; Πηδάλιο; Πτερύγιο (skeg); Άλλο
de: Art der Spurhilfe: Ruder und Skeg; Keine; Ruder; Skeg; Sonstige
ru: Тип системы курсовой устойчивости: Руль и скег; Нет; Руль; Скег; Другое
da: Type af sporingshjælp: Både ror og finne; Ingen; Ror; Finne; Andet
tr: Takip yardım sistemi tipi: Hem dümen hem salma; Yok; Dümen; Salma; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ sledovacej pomôcky: Kormidlo aj skeg; Žiadne; Kormidlo; Skeg; Iné
cs: Typ pomůcky pro sledování směru: Kormidlo i skeg; Žádný; Kormidlo; Skeg; Jiný
sl-SI: Vrsta pripomočka za sledenje: Krmilo in smernik; Brez; Krmilo; Smernik; Drugo
es: Tipo de asistencia de seguimiento: Timón y orza; Ninguno; Timón; Orza; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul dispozitivului de menținere a direcției: Și cârmă, și derivor; Niciunul; Cârmă; Derivor; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de auxílio de direção: Leme e patilhão; Nenhum; Leme; Patilhão; Outro
ja: 直進補助装置タイプ: ラダーとスケグの両方; なし; ラダー; スケグ; その他
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ช่วยติดตาม: ทั้งหางเสือและครีบใต้ท้องเรือ; ไม่มี; หางเสือ; ครีบใต้ท้องเรือ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type d’aide à la tenue de cap: Gouvernail et dérive; Aucun; Gouvernail; Dérive; Autre
it: Tipo di ausilio alla direzionalità: Timone e skeg; Nessuno; Timone; Skeg; Altro
fi: Ohjauksen lisävarustetyyppi: Sekä peräsin että evä; Ei mitään; Peräsin; Evä; Muu
sv: Typ av spårningshjälpmedel: Både roder och skädda; Inget; Roder; Skädda; Övrigt
zh-TW: 循跡輔助用具類型: 船舵與尾鰭; 無; 船舵; 尾鰭; 其他
ko: 직진 보조 장치 유형: 러더 및 스케그 모두; 없음; 러더; 스케그; 기타
vi: Loại thiết bị theo dõi: Cả bánh lái và vây; Không có; Bánh lái; Vây cá (Skeg); Khác
nl: Trackinghulpmiddel type: Zowel roer als skeg; Geen; Roer; Skeg; Overig
nb: Type sporingshjelp: Både ror og senkekjøl; Ingen; Ror; Senkekjøl; Annet
pt-BR: Acessório de rastreamento tipo: Leme e skeg; Nenhum; Leme; Skeg; Outro
bg-BG: Тип помощно средство за поддържане на посоката: И рул, и шверт; Няма; Рул; Шверт; Друго
pl: Typ urządzenia do utrzymania kursu: Ster i skeg; Brak; Ster; Skeg; Inne
lt-LT: Sekimo priemonės tipas: Tiek vairas, tiek stabilizatorius (skegas); Nėra; Vairas; Stabilizatorius (skegas); Kita